Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.460

Military recruitment program for veterans—Development—Report.

(1) The office shall develop a military recruitment program that targets veterans and gives them credit for their knowledge, skills, and leadership abilities. In developing the program, the office shall consult with the department of enterprise services, department of veteran[s] affairs, the state military transition council, the veterans employee resource group, and other interested stakeholders. Program development must include, but is not limited to, identifying: (a) Public and private military recruitment programs and ways those programs can be used in Washington; (b) similar military and state job classes and develop a system to provide veterans with experience credit for similar work; and (c) barriers to state employment and opportunities to better utilize veterans experience.

(2) The office shall report to the legislature with a draft plan by January 1, 2018, that includes draft bill language if necessary.

[ 2017 c 192 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2017 c 192: "The legislature finds that:

(1) Washington state provides a stated preference for hiring veterans and provides a scoring preference for hiring and promotional opportunities to veterans in the form of enhanced test scores;

(2) Few agencies outside of law enforcement use tests in hiring or promotion;

(3) Veterans have experience that is broader than law enforcement and the state can benefit by recruiting people with this experience;

(4) Veterans leave service with experience in transportation, teaching and education, logistics, computer technology, health care, media and communications, construction and engineering, and administrative support;

(5) Many state agencies and other public employers are struggling to fill and retain employees in key positions;

(6) Many public and private employers have developed veteran hiring and recruitment programs that take advantage of the broad experience that veterans bring to the job market." [ 2017 c 192 s 3.]

Findings—2017 c 192: See note following RCW 43.60A.100.